Massachusetts, session 194th, H1800.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There is hereby established a special legislative commission to identify 
ways the commonwealth can more effectively deter and prosecute check washing crimes. For the 
purposes of this section, “check washing” shall be defined as the act of intercepting a check or 
money order and chemically or otherwise altering the check or money order to change the name 
of the payee, the dollar amount, or both and fraudulently cashing or depositing, or attempting to 
cash or deposit, the check or money order. 
The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on 
financial services, who shall co-chair the commission and convene its first meeting within 60 
days of the effective date of this act; the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on 
consumer protection and professional licensure; one member appointed by the senate president; 
one member appointed by the senate minority leader; one member appointed by the house 
speaker; one member appointed by the house minority leader; the commissioner of banks or their 

of 2 13 designee; a representative from the Massachusetts bankers association; the secretary of public 
safety and security or their designee; a representative from the Massachusetts chiefs of police 
association; and two members appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a retired postal 
worker or postmaster and one of whom shall have a minimum of five years of federal law 
enforcement experience.  
The commission may convene one or more hearings to solicit input from the public. In 
conducting its investigation, the commission shall consider, but not be limited to: identifying 
ways to better protect consumers from falling victim to check washing schemes; determining 
appropriate penalties for those who engage in check washing; and identifying more effective 
means of prosecuting check washing crimes. 
The commission shall file a report containing its findings, along with any legislative 
recommendations, with the clerk of the house and the clerk of the senate on or before June 30, 
2026.